New Mexico, session 2026, SB278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 63-9D-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989,
Chapter 25, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read:
"63-9D-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Enhanced 911 Act:
A. "911 call" means any real-time communication,
message, signal or transmission between a person needing
assistance and a public safety answering point call-taker by
dialing 9-1-1 or its equivalent;
B. "911 service area" means the area designated by
the fiscal agent, local governing body or the division to
receive enhanced 911 service;
C. "access line" means [a telecommunications
.233916.1

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
company's line that has the capability] the number of
simultaneous calls a telecommunications company's line can make
to reach local public safety agencies by dialing 911,
regardless of hardware, technology or actual use, but does not
include a line used for the provision of interexchange services
or commercial mobile radio service;
D. "commercial mobile radio service" means service
provided by a wireless real-time two-way voice communication
device, including:
(1) radio-telephone communications used in
cellular telephone service;
(2) the functional or competitive equivalent
of radio-telephone communications used in cellular telephone
service;
(3) a personal communications service; or
(4) a network radio access line;
E. "commercial mobile radio service provider" means
a person who provides commercial mobile radio services,
including a person who purchases commercial mobile radio
service from a provider and resells that service;
F. "commission" means the public regulation
commission;
G. "communication service" means any service that:

(1) is capable of and required by law to

access, connect with or interface with the enhanced 911 system

.233916.1
- 2 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
by directly dialing, initializing or otherwise activating the
enhanced 911 system regardless of the transmission medium or
technology employed; and
(2) provides or enables real-time or
interactive communication;
H. "communications service provider" means any
entity that provides communication services;
I. "database" means information that is collected,
formatted and disseminated and that is necessary for the
functioning of the enhanced 911 system, including geographic
information system (GIS) addressing and digital mapping
information;
J. "department" means the taxation and revenue
department;
K. "division" means the local government division
of the department of finance and administration;
L. "enhanced 911 surcharge" means the monthly
uniform charge assessed on each access line in the state,
measured by the number of access lines for which the access
line provider enables the capacity for simultaneous calls to be
connected to the public switched telephone network, regardless

of hardware, technology or actual use and on each active number 22
for a commercial mobile radio service subscriber and on the

number of VoIP lines for which the VoIP service provider

enables the capacity for simultaneous calls, regardless of

.233916.1
- 3 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
actual usage, to be connected to the public switched telephone
network during the period for which the fixed charge is imposed
for a VoIP service subscriber in New Mexico and the charge
assessed on any other consumer purchase of communication
service provided by a communications service provider that
enables communication between a person needing assistance and a
public safety answering point call-taker by dialing 9-1-1 or
its equivalent; provided that an enhanced 911 surcharge shall
not be assessed on the provision of broadband internet access
service;
M. "enhanced 911 system" means, regardless of the
technology used, a landline, wireless, NG-911 or ESInet system
consisting of network switching equipment, database, mapping
and on-premises equipment, or the functional equivalent
thereof, that uses the single three-digit number 911 for
reporting police, fire, medical or other emergency situations,
thereby enabling a caller to reach a public safety answering
point to report emergencies by dialing 911, and includes the
capability to:
(1) selectively route incoming 911 calls to
the appropriate public safety answering point operating in a
911 service area;
(2) automatically display the name, address

and telephone number of an incoming 911 call on a video monitor

at the appropriate public safety answering point;

.233916.1
- 4 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
(3) provide one or more access paths for
communications between users at different geographic locations
through a network system that may be designed for voice, text
or data, or any combination of these, and may feature limited
or open access and may employ appropriate analog, digital
switching or transmission technologies;
(4) relay to a designated public safety
answering point a 911 caller's number and base station or cell
site location and the latitude and longitude of the 911
caller's location in relation to the designated public safety
answering point; and
(5) manage or administer the functions listed
in Paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection;
N. "enhanced 911 equipment" means the public safety
answering point equipment directly related to the operation of
an enhanced 911 system, including automatic number
identification or automatic location identification controllers
and display units, printers, logging recorders and software
associated with call detail recording, call center work
stations, training, latitude and longitude base station or cell
site location data and GIS equipment necessary to obtain and

process locational map and emergency service zone data for 22
landline and wireless callers;

O. "equipment supplier" means a person who provides

or offers to provide communications equipment necessary for the

.233916.1
- 5 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
establishment of enhanced 911 services;
P. "ESInet" means emergency services internet
protocol network, an internet-protocol-based, multipurpose
inter-network supporting local, regional, state and national
public safety communications services in addition to 911;
Q. "fiscal agent" means the local governing body
that administers grants from the fund for a given locality or
region by agreement;
R. "fund" means the enhanced 911 fund;
S. "local governing body" means the board of county
commissioners of a county or the governing body of a
municipality as defined in the Municipal Code;
T. "NG-911" means a next generation 911 system
consisting of network, hardware, software, data and operational
policies and procedures that:
(1) provides standardized interfaces from call
and message services;
(2) processes all types of emergency calls,
including non-voice (multimedia) messages;
(3) acquires and integrates additional data
useful to call routing and handling;
(4) delivers the calls, messages and data to
appropriate public safety answering points and other

appropriate emergency entities;

(5) supports data and communications needs for

.233916.1
- 6 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
coordinated incident response and management; and
(6) provides a secure environment for
emergency communications;
U. "proprietary information" means customer lists,
customer counts, technology descriptions or trade secrets,
including the actual or development costs of individual
components of an enhanced 911 system; provided that such
information is designated as proprietary by the communications
service provider; and provided further that "proprietary
information" does not include individual payments made by the
division or any list of names and identifying information of
subscribers who have not paid the surcharge;
V. "public safety answering point" means a twenty-
four-hour local communications facility that receives 911
service communications and directly dispatches emergency
response services or that relays communications to the
appropriate public or private safety agency;
W. "subscriber" means a person who purchases
communication services at retail from a communications service
provider that are capable of originating a 911 communication;
X. "surcharge" means the 911 emergency surcharge;

Y. "surcharge collected" means the amount of 22
enhanced 911 surcharge billed or received or deemed to have

been received by the seller or provider, consistent with the

seller's or provider's method of accounting, including accrual

.233916.1
- 7 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___C/SB 278
or cash;
Z. "telecommunications company" means a person who
provides wire telecommunications services that are capable of
originating a 911 communication;
AA. "vendor" means a person that provides 911
equipment, service or network support;
BB. "VoIP" means "interconnected voice-over-
internet protocol service" as defined in the Code of Federal
Regulations, Title 47, Part 9, Section 9.3, as amended; and
CC. "VoIP service provider" or "interconnected
voice-over-internet protocol service provider" means an entity
that provides interconnected voice-over-internet protocol
service to end users."
- 8 -











.233916.1